District of Columbia statutes.
38-934

Repealed

Capitalization.

Repealed.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-170, § 9, 33 DCR 7188
Apr. 8, 1992, D.C. Law 9-93, § 2, 39 DCR 1371
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 401(j), 45 DCR 1172
1981 Ed., § 31-2508.